Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 7 HOUSING AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND FINANCING
29-4-718. Bonds and notes.

The authority has the power and is authorized to issue from time to time its notes and bonds in such principal amounts as the authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of the authority, the establishment of reserves to secure such notes and bonds, and all other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers.

The authority has the power, from time to time, to issue:

Notes to renew notes;

Bonds to pay notes, including the interest thereon, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds or obligations of other public entities, whether the bonds or such other obligations to be refunded have or have not matured; and

Bonds partly to refund bonds or obligations of other public entities then outstanding and partly for any of its corporate purposes.

Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this paragraph (b) may be exchanged for the bonds or obligations of other public entities to be refunded or sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption, or payment of such bonds or obligations.

The authority has the power to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its notes and bonds shall be general obligations of the authority payable out of any revenues or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging any particular revenues.

The notes and bonds shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by the board.

Any resolution authorizing any notes or bonds or any issue thereof may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof, as to:

Pledging all or any part of the revenues of the authority to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

Pledging all or any part of the assets of the authority to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of notes or bonds, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist, such assets to include:

Any grant or contribution from the federal government or any corporation, association, institution, or person; or

Financing agreements, mortgages or home improvement loans, and obligations securing the same;

The use and disposition of the gross income from financing agreements and mortgages owned by the authority and payment of principal of financing agreements and mortgages owned by the authority;

The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of notes or bonds may be applied and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof;

Limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds, the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other notes or bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with noteholders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of notes or bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Limitations on the amount of moneys to be expended by the authority for operating expenses of the authority;

Vesting in a trustee such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to this part 7, and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee under this part 7 or limiting the rights, powers, and duties of such trustee;

Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the authority to the holders of the notes or bonds and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the notes or bonds in the event of such default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver; except that such rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of this state and the other provisions of this part 7;

Any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way affect the security or protection of the holders of the notes or bonds.

The bonds or notes of each issue may, in the discretion of the authority, be made redeemable before maturity at such prices and under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the authority. Notes shall mature at such time as may be determined by the authority, and bonds shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty-five years from their date of issue, as may be determined by the authority. The notes and bonds shall bear interest at such fixed or variable rate or rates determined by or in accordance with methods approved by the authority without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law of this state, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment and at such place, and be subject to such terms of redemption as the authority may provide. The notes and bonds of the authority may be sold by the authority, at public or private sale, at such price as the board shall determine.

In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or notes or coupons attached thereto ceases to be such officer before the delivery thereof, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The board may also provide for the authentication of the bonds or notes by a trustee or fiscal agent.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds or notes, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds or notes until such definitive bonds or notes have been executed and are available for delivery.

The authority, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist, has the power out of any funds available therefor to purchase notes or bonds of the authority, which shall thereupon, at the election of the authority, be canceled.

In the discretion of the authority, the bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the power of a trust company within or without this state. Such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. The authority may provide by such trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and the revenues to the trustee under such trust indenture or other depository and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of the authority. If the bonds are secured by a trust indenture, the bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them, except as may be otherwise provided in such trust indenture.

Repealed.

The authority has the power and is authorized to issue from time to time notes, bonds, and other securities which may be collateralized or otherwise secured in whole or in part by loans or participations or other interests in such loans or which may evidence loans or participations or other interests in such loans to provide net funds that are to be dedicated in whole or in part by resolution of the authority to the carrying out of one or more of the purposes of the authority. The interest on or from such notes, bonds, and other securities may be subject to or exempt from federal income taxation.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 812, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-14.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 978, § 11, effective April 9.

L. 76:

(9) amended, p. 692, § 1, effective April 16 .

L. 77:

(3)(b)(III) amended, p. 1414, § 5, effective June 19.

L. 78:

(9) amended, p. 441, § 1, effective February 15.

L. 79:

(9) amended, p. 1130, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 81:

(9) amended, p. 1412, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 82:

(3)(b)(II), (3)(c), and (9) amended, p. 468, § 10, effective April 3.

L. 85:

(9) amended, p. 1040, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(9) amended and (10) added, p. 1198, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(9) amended, p. 717, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(9) repealed, p. 311, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2007:

(1)(b)(I)(B), (1)(b)(I)(C), (1)(b)(II), (2), (4), (7), and (8) amended, p. 708, § 11, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-714 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Facsimile Signature of Public Officials Act", see §§ 11-55-101 to 11-55-106.

29-4-719. Special funds - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 984, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 82:

(4)(a) amended and (4)(b) repealed, p. 473, §§ 8, 9, effective April 15.

L. 2001:

IP(1) amended and (9) and (10) added, p. 311, § 2, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

This section was repealed, effective March 8, 2010, upon receipt by the revisor of statutes of notice that all outstanding bonds of the Colorado Housing Finance Authority, with respect to which capital reserve funds were established pursuant to this section, were paid in full.

29-4-719.1. Economic development fund.

There is hereby created in the authority the economic development fund. The authority shall deposit into such economic development fund:

Any moneys appropriated and made available by the state for purposes of such economic development fund;

Any proceeds from the sale of bonds to the extent provided in the resolutions of the authority authorizing the issuance thereof; and

Any moneys which may be made available by or to the authority from any other sources for the purposes of such economic development fund.

Moneys held in the economic development fund shall be expended by the authority for the following purposes:

To pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on bonds issued by the authority pursuant to this part 7 to finance the authority's economic development program;

To finance projects or provide capital as provided in this part 7;

To provide guaranties, insurance, coinsurance, or reinsurance as provided in this part 7 and to establish reserves therefor by separate accounts or in such other manner as may be determined by the board in its sole discretion;

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 29-4-730, to make equity investments in business enterprises, including but not limited to direct investments in such business enterprises, investments in a legal entity which makes investments in such enterprises, and investments in an investment fund which makes investments in such enterprises, on such terms and conditions and as evidenced by such certificates, instruments, or documents, all as may be determined by the board in its sole discretion; except that properties, or revenues of the authority, other than the amount of such investments, shall not be placed at risk on account of such investments, and neither the authority nor the members of the board or employees of the authority shall be personally liable for the debts or obligations of the business enterprises in which such investments are made; and

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 29-4-710.5 and 29-4-710.6, and upon a finding by the board that investment in, or purchase or participation in the purchase of, loans or interests therein is necessary or useful to the financing of projects or the provision of capital to business enterprises, to invest in, purchase, or participate in the purchase from lenders of loans to finance projects or provide capital to business enterprises if such loans shall be insured or guaranteed, in whole or in part, by the federal government or by an agency or instrumentality thereof.

Repealed.

Moneys held in the economic development fund may be transferred to any of the other funds created by the authority pursuant to this part 7.

There is hereby created within the economic development fund the Colorado strategic seed fund, which fund shall be administered by the authority in consultation with the Colorado strategic seed fund council created in section 29-4-735. The Colorado strategic seed fund is established for the purpose of providing seed capital to small businesses. For the purposes of this subsection (4), "seed capital" means moneys which are provided for: The preparation of a business plan, the performance of an initial market analysis, the assembling of a management team, the initial legal and accounting work, the development of a working prototype of a product or process, the development of follow-up financing, and such similar purposes as may be determined by the board.

The general assembly may make appropriations to the department of local affairs for the Colorado strategic seed fund. Any moneys not used to make loans shall remain in said fund and shall not be transferred to or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year. Any interest earned on the investment or deposit of moneys in the Colorado strategic seed fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund of the state.

The authority shall utilize moneys in the Colorado strategic seed fund to make loans to operating seed funds. Such loans shall be made only if the board determines that:

The businesses to be assisted are small businesses with no prior sales or small businesses with existing sales, which small businesses are undergoing substantial changes in their businesses or product lines;

No professional or institutional investor has made any prior investment in any business to be assisted prior to the investment by the operating seed fund;

The businesses to be assisted have the potential to be rapidly growing businesses or value-added businesses which have the potential of having a long-term presence in Colorado's economy and the amount invested by any operating seed fund in businesses outside of Colorado do not exceed more than fifty percent of the capital of the operating seed fund;

Private sector financial support equal to the amount of any loan will be obtained by an operating seed fund. The authority may make a preliminary commitment of funds to an operating seed fund before the private sector financial support is obtained, but the authority shall not close the loan until at least one-third of the private sector financial support has been contributed, with the remainder to be paid not later than two years after the date of closing.

The authority shall establish criteria for making loans to operating seed funds, and such criteria shall include qualifications for the managers of such funds. The authority shall consult with the Colorado strategic seed fund council as to the criteria for determining which operating seed funds shall be eligible to receive loans from the fund, and no more than one operating seed fund, which fund shall be the rural economic development seed fund created in paragraph (g) of this subsection (4), shall be assisted pursuant to this subsection (4).

Loans made by the authority to operating seed funds shall be in the form of nonrecourse, noncompounding loans bearing interest, which shall be accrued at a rate determined by the board. The principal and accrued interest on any such loan shall be due not later than the initially scheduled termination date of the operating seed fund or ten years from the date of closing of the loan, whichever date is earlier.

The authority may require that an operating seed fund receiving a loan under this subsection (4) submit a quarterly financial statement, an audited annual financial statement, and such other reports regarding its finances and operations as the board determines to be necessary or appropriate.

Of the seed funds established pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (4), one shall be a rural economic development seed fund, which shall be established for the purpose of assisting economic development in rural areas of Colorado. The moneys in the rural economic development seed fund shall be used to assist value-added businesses, and all of the provisions of this subsection (4) relating to loans made by the authority to operating seed funds shall also apply to the rural economic development seed fund. The salary of the fund manager shall be paid out of moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly and not from matching private sector funds.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1194, § 12, effective May 20.

L. 88:

(4) added, p. 1102, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 89:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1265, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 93:

(2)(f) added, p. 2136, § 11, effective June 12.

L. 95:

IP(2)(f)(II) amended, p. 1111, § 66, effective May 31; (2)(f)(I)(E) and (2)(f)(II) to (2)(f)(V) amended, p. 1115, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2)(f)(I)(G) amended, p. 814, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(2)(f)(IV) and (2)(f)(V) amended, p. 1067, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(2)(f)(II) repealed, p. 1178, § 11, effective August 8.

29-4-720. Validity of any pledge.

Any pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, and any assets or revenues shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the board from selling any assets subject to any such pledge, except to the extent that any such sale may be restricted by a trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 813, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-15.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 981, § 12, effective April 9.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-715 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-721. Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this part 7, or any coupons appertaining thereto and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, except to the extent the rights under this part 7 may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted under this part 7 or under such agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the authority pursuant to this part 7, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this part 7 or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the authority or by an officer thereof.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 813, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-16.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-716 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-722. Negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this part 7 or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this part 7, all such bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto shall be negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-17.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-717 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-723. Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this part 7 are hereby made securities in which all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the state is authorized by law.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-18.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1130, § 69, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-718 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-724. Refunding bonds.

The board may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations of the authority for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding that have been issued under this part 7 or issued by other public entities, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations, and for any corporate purpose of the authority.

Refunding obligations issued as provided in subsection (1) of this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations being refunded, and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of any such refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, the accrued interest, and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing the same, to the payment of any interest on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in securities meeting the investment requirements established by the authority, which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-19.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 981, § 13, effective April 9.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1113, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 710, § 12, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-719 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-725. Nonliability of state for bonds.

The state of Colorado shall not be liable for bonds of the authority, and such bonds shall not constitute a debt of the state. The bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to such effect.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-20.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-720 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-726. Members of authority not personally liable on bonds.

Neither the members of the board nor any authorized person executing bonds issued pursuant to this part 7 shall be personally liable for such bonds by reason of the execution or issuance thereof.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-21.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-721 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-727. Property taxation - exemption of bonds from taxation.

In any instance where a proposed housing facility or project, whether owned by the authority or by another sponsor, would qualify for a property tax exemption under the laws of Colorado, the board may require that, as a condition for a loan or other assistance under this part 7, any such property shall be subject to an agreement between the taxing authorities and the authority or the sponsor for payments in lieu of taxes; except that, in the case of a housing facility, such payments shall not exceed ten percent of the rentals of such housing facility.

Any bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of this part 7, their transfer, and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state.

Except where an agreement for payments in lieu of taxes has been entered into as provided in subsection (1) of this section, where property of the authority would qualify for a property tax exemption under the laws of this state and unless property of the sponsor would qualify for a property tax exemption under the laws of this state, the authority shall annually pay, solely from the revenues from the project and not from any other source, to this state and to the city, town, school district, and any other political subdivision or public body authorized to levy taxes in the jurisdiction in which the project is located, a sum equal to the amount of tax which the taxing entity would annually receive if title to the property were held directly by the sponsor, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding. In addition to the requirements of section 29-4-710.5, the authority, before entering into a financing agreement for a project pursuant to this part 7, shall make a prior determination of the sufficiency of revenues for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section or this subsection (3), and each financing agreement shall provide for revenues sufficient to meet the payments required by this subsection (3).

If and to the extent the proceedings under which the notes or bonds issued to finance the project so provide, the authority may agree to cooperate with the sponsor of a project in connection with any administrative or judicial proceedings for determining the validity or amount of any such payments and may agree to appoint or designate and reserve the right in and for such sponsor to take all action which the authority may lawfully take in respect of such payments and all matters relating thereto, but such sponsor shall bear and pay all costs and expenses of the authority thereby incurred at the request of such sponsor or by reason of any such action taken by such sponsor in behalf of the authority.

Any sponsor which has made payments in lieu of taxes in accordance with subsection (1) of this section or paid the amounts required by subsection (3) of this section to be paid by the authority shall not be required to pay taxes on such property to the state or to any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding. In the event title to the project is held directly by a private person or corporation, the financing agreement shall require such private person or corporation to pay the taxes which such taxing entity or entities are entitled to receive from such private person or corporation with respect to the project.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-22.

L. 82:

(1) R&RE, p. 469, §§ 11, 12, effective April 23.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 710, § 13, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-722 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-728. Revolving fund established.

The board shall establish a revolving fund and shall pay into such revolving fund any moneys made available by the federal, state, or local government for the purpose of assisting in the provision of housing facilities for low- and moderate-income families. The board shall also deposit in such fund any other moneys which may be available to the authority for its general purposes from any source or sources other than proceeds from the issuance and sale of bonds by the authority.

All moneys held in the revolving fund, including but not limited to income or interest earned by, or any other increment to, such fund shall be used by the board for its general purposes, and to the extent authorized by the board any such moneys in excess of the amount required to make and keep the authority self-supporting shall be deposited to a surplus fund. Any such surplus moneys may from time to time, at the board's discretion, be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 814, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-23.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-723 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-729. Reporting.

The authority shall submit to the governor and the health, environment, welfare, and institutions committees of the house of representatives and the senate within six months after the end of the fiscal year a report that shall set forth a complete and detailed operating and financial statement of the authority during such year. Also included in the report shall be any recommendations with reference to additional legislation or other action that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority.

On or before December 31, 2001, the authority, acting through the program, created and administered by the authority, commonly known as E-Star Colorado, or the successor to such program, shall submit to the governor and general assembly an assessment of existing energy conservation and efficiency programs and standards established by the state, local governmental entities, or private entities. The assessment shall include a comparison of such programs and standards to similar programs and standards adopted in other states, as well as an evaluation of the effectiveness of voluntary performance programs and other financial incentives. The authority, on behalf of E-Star Colorado, may accept and expend moneys from gifts, grants, and donations to help defray the expenses of providing the assessment required under this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 73:

p. 815, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-24.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1178, § 12, effective August 8; entire section amended, p. 1093, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2013, § 106, effective May 22.

29-4-730. Powers of the authority - investments.

The authority has the power:

To invest any funds held in reserve, sinking funds, capital reserve funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement in property or in securities in which the state treasurer may legally invest funds subject to his control; and to sell from time to time such securities thus purchased and held; and to deposit any securities in any trust bank within or without the state. Any funds deposited in a banking institution or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., shall be secured in such manner and subject to such terms and conditions as the board may determine, with or without payment of any interest on such deposit, including, without limitation, time deposits evidenced by certificates of deposit. Any commercial bank incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as depository of any funds of the authority may issue indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as may be required by the board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), to contract with the holders of any of its notes or bonds as to the custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any moneys of the authority and of any moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of notes or bonds and to carry out such contract. Moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of notes or bonds or in any way to secure notes or bonds and deposits of such moneys may be secured in the same manner as moneys of the authority, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits.

To authorize a corporate trustee which holds funds of the authority pursuant to a bond or note resolution or a trust indenture between such trustee and the authority to invest or reinvest such funds in any investments, other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), if the board determines by resolution, including but not limited to a bond or note resolution, that, as of the date of such resolution:

Such investments meet the standard for investments established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S.;

The income on such investments is at least comparable to income then available on the investments permitted in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1); and

Such investments assist the authority in carrying out its public purposes as described in this part 7.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 982, § 14, effective April 23.

L. 79:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1618, § 19, effective June 8.

L. 85:

(1) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 1040, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(c)(III) amended, p. 1195, § 13, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-725 in House Bill 75-1026 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-731. Agreement of this state.

This state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any notes or bonds issued under this part 7 that this state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the said holders thereof or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such notes and bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of this state in any agreement with the holders of such notes or bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 982, § 14, effective April 9.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-726 in House Bill 75-1026 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-732. This part 7 not a limitation of powers.

Nothing in this part 7 shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any other powers which the authority might otherwise have under any other law of this state, and this part 7 is cumulative to any such powers. This part 7 does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. However, the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations and refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 7 need not comply with the requirements of any other state law applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations. No proceedings, notice, or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds, notes, or other obligations or any instrument as security therefor, except as is provided in this part 7.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 983, § 14, effective April 9.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-727 in House Bill 75-1026 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-733. Termination of powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 470, § 13, effective April 23.

L. 87:

Entire section repealed, p. 1197, § 21, effective May 20.

29-4-734. Termination of powers.

On and after June 30, 1992, the authority may not make equity investments pursuant to the powers granted to the authority by section 29-4-719.1 (2)(d). The authority may continue to discharge all present and future obligations regarding equity investments made prior to June 30, 1992.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1196, § 14, effective May 20.

29-4-735. Colorado strategic seed fund council - creation.

There is hereby created the Colorado strategic seed fund council. Said council shall be composed of nine members, as follows: Four venture capitalists, one management consultant, and two institutional investors, all of whom shall be appointed by the governor, and one member appointed by the president of the senate and one member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The members of the council shall be confirmed by the senate and shall serve for terms of four years; except that, of the members first appointed, three shall be appointed for terms of two years, three shall be appointed for terms of three years, and three shall be appointed for terms of four years.

At the request of the board, the Colorado strategic seed fund council shall provide advice to the authority from time to time as to the criteria to be used in making loans, and the council shall make recommendations to the board with respect to the board's determinations regarding such loans from the Colorado strategic seed fund to operating seed funds. Said council shall receive reports from the authority regarding the operations and investments of the operating seed funds and shall make an annual report on the operating seed funds to the health and human services committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1103, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 1178, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2013, § 107, effective May 22.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 2045, § 82, effective June 1.